Utah statutes.
58-40a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
The division shall issue a license to practice as an athletic trainer to an
applicant who:
(1)  has obtained a bachelor's or advanced degree from an accredited four-year
college or university and meets the minimum athletic training curriculum
requirement established by the board by rule;
(2)  has successfully completed the certification examination administered by
the Board of Certification Inc. or equivalent examination approved or
recognized by the board;
(3)  is in good standing with and provides documentation of current
certification by the Board of Certification Inc. or a nationally recognized
credentialing agency approved by the board;
(4)  submits an application to the division on a form prescribed by the
division; and
(5)  pays the required licensing fee as determined by the department under
Section 63J-1-504.
